sk-SK: Rez artičoku: Malé celé; Spodná časť; Srdcia; Ošúpané; Nakrájané na štvrťky; Nakrájané na plátky; Stonka; Orezaná miska (Çanak); Celé; Iné
fi: Artisokan osa: Kokonainen baby; Pohja; Sydän; Kuorittu; Neljään osaan leikattu; Viipaloitu; Varsi; Trimmattu kuppi (Çanak); Kokonainen; Muu
hr-HR: Rez artičoke: Cijela (baby); Baza; Srce; Oguljeno; U četvrtinama; Narezano; Stabljika; Obrezana zdjelica (Çanak); Cijelo; Ostalo
cs: Řez artyčoku: Mini, celé; Spodní část; Srdce; Oloupané; Na čtvrtky; Na plátky; Stonek; Očištěná miska (Çanak); Celé; Ostatní
ja: アーティチョークカット: ベビーホール; ボトム; ハート; 皮むき; 四つ割り; スライス; 茎; トリムボウル (チャナク); ホール; その他
vi: Kiểu cắt atiso: Nguyên búp non; Đế; Lõi; Gọt vỏ; Cắt tư; Cắt lát; Cuống; Đế tỉa sẵn (Çanak); Nguyên búp; Khác
tr: Enginar kesimi: Bebek bütün; Taban; Göbek; Soyulmuş; Dörde bölünmüş; Dilimlenmiş; Sap; Temizlenmiş çanak; Bütün; Diğer
el: Κοπή αγκινάρας: Ολόκληρο baby; Βάση; Καρδιά; Αποφλοιωμένο; Κομμένο στα τέσσερα; Σε φέτες; Μίσχος; Καθαρισμένο (Çanak); Ολόκληρο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Del artičoke: Mlade cele; Dno; Srčki; Olupljene; Narezane na četrtine; Narezane na rezine; Steblo; Obrezane v posodico (Çanak); Cele; Drugo
zh-TW: 朝鮮薊切塊: 幼兒全顆; 底部; 菜心; 去皮; 切四塊; 切片; 莖部; 修剪碗狀 (Çanak); 全顆; 其他
nb: Artisjokkskåret: Små hele; Bunn; Hjerte; Skrelt; I kvarte; I skiver; Stilk; Trimmet skål (Çanak); Hel; Annet
pt-PT: Corte de alcachofra: Inteira mini; Fundo; Coração; Descascada; Em quartos; Fatiada; Caule; Base aparada (Çanak); Inteira; Outros
de: Artischockenschnitt: Ganz (Baby); Boden; Herz; Geschält; Geviertelt; In Scheiben; Stiel; Getrimmter Boden (Çanak); Ganz; Sonstige
zh-CN: 洋蓟切法: 迷你全颗; 底部; 菜心; 去皮; 四等分; 切片; 茎部; 碗状修剪 (Çanak); 全颗; 其他
hu: Articsókavágás: Bébi, egész; Alsó rész; Szív; Hámozott; Negyedelt; Szeletelt; Szár; Tisztított kehely (Çanak); Egész; Egyéb
ro-RO: Anghinare tăiată: Baby, întregi; Bază; Inimă; Decojit; Sferturi; Felii; Tulpină; Bază curățată (Çanak); Întreg; Altele
fr: Coupe de l’artichaut: Bébé entier; Fond; Cœur; Pelé; En quartiers; En tranches; Tige; Fond paré (Çanak); Entier; Autre
it: Taglio di carciofo: Baby intero; Fondo; Cuore; Pelato; A quarti; A fette; Gambo; Scodella pulita (Çanak); Intero; Altro
es: Corte de alcachofa: Baby entera; Fondo; Corazón; Pelada; En cuartos; En rodajas; Tallo; Cuenco limpio (Çanak); Entera; Otro
da: Artiskokudskæring: Hele, baby; Bund; Hjerte; Skrællet; I kvarte; I skiver; Stilk; Trimmet skål (Çanak); Hele; Andet
bg-BG: Разрез на артишока: Бейби цял; Дъно; Сърцевина; Обелен; На четвъртини; Нарязан; Стъбло; Почистена чашка (Çanak); Цял; Друго
ru: Нарезка артишока: Мелкие целые; Донца; Сердцевины; Очищенные; На четыре части; Нарезанные; Стебли; Очищенные чашечки (Çanak); Целые; Другое
nl: Artisjok snijvorm: Hele baby-artisjok; Bodem; Hart; Gepeld; In vieren; In plakjes; Stengel; Getrimd (çanak); Heel; Overige
ko: 아티초크 손질 형태: 미니 홀; 바텀; 하트; 껍질 벗김; 4등분; 슬라이스; 줄기; 트리밍 보울(차나크); 홀; 기타
pl: Forma karczocha: Małe w całości; Spody; Serca; Obrane; Ćwiartki; Plastry; Łodygi; Oczyszczone dno (Çanak); W całości; Inne
th: รูปแบบการตัดอาร์ติโชก: เบบี้ (ทั้งลูก); ฐาน; ใจกลาง; ปอกเปลือก; หั่นสี่ส่วน; หั่นสไลซ์; ก้าน; ทรงชามตกแต่ง (Çanak); ทั้งลูก; อื่นๆ
sv: Kronärtskockform: Små hela; Botten; Hjärta; Skalad; Kvartad; Skivad; Stjälk; Trimmad botten (Çanak); Hel; Annat
lt-LT: Artišoko supjaustymo būdas: Jauni, nepjaustyti; Dugneliai; Šerdelės; Nulupti; Ketvirčiuoti; Pjaustyti; Stiebeliai; Apipjaustyti į dubenėlį („Çanak“); Nepjaustyti; Kita
en: Artichoke cut: Baby whole; Bottom; Heart; Peeled; Quartered; Sliced; Stem; Trimmed bowl (Çanak); Whole; Other
pt-BR: Corte da alcachofra: Baby inteira; Fundo; Coração; Descascada; Em quartos; Fatiada; Talo; Fundo limpo (Çanak); Inteira; Outro